BFN 

<F P=106> [Report on work of the government given by Li Qiyan, mayor </F>
of Beijing Municipality, at the second session of the 10th 
Beijing Municipal people's congress on 8 April] 
  [Text] Fellow Deputies: 
  I now submit a report on behalf of the Beijing Municipal 
people's government, to the present session for examination. 
<H5>  1. Review of 1993 </H5>
  Nineteen ninety-three was a year in which we upheld the 
party's basic line, comprehensively implemented the guidelines 
of the 14th party congress, and made big strides forward along 
the path of building socialism with Chinese characteristics. 
Under the leadership of the CPC Central Committee, the State 
Council, and the Beijing Municipal party committee, the people 
of various nationalities across the municipality emancipated 
their minds, advanced in a pioneering spirit, accelerated the 
pace of reform, opening up, and socialist modernization, 
conscientiously implemented the resolutions of the first session 
of the 10th municipal people's congress, fulfilled and 
overfulfilled the national economic and social development plan, 
and comprehensively realized the fighting objective of 
surpassing the achievements of the previous year. 
  A. The national economy increased by a large margin, the 
markets were brisk, and the people's living was further 
improved. The total gross domestic products during the year 
were valued at 85.2 billion yuan, up 12 percent over the 
previous year. The local financial revenue reached 8.41 billion 
yuan, up 4.8 percent. In grain production, the exceptionally 
serious drought which was rarely seen for 50 years was overcome. 
The per-unit area yield reached 415.7 kg and the total output 
reached 2.84 billion kg, all setting the best records in history 
and marking the year as the 16th bumper harvest year. The 
production of major, nonstaple foods steadily increased, the 
varieties were abundant, and the supply was adequate. Township 
enterprises maintained a strong trend of development with total 
income reaching 46.87 billion yuan, up 63.2 percent over the 
previous year. The pace to develop the mountainous areas was 
accelerated. The average per-capita labor income of 60 outlying 
remote townships and towns reached 1,189 yuan, up 19.3 percent. 
Under the situation in which funds and electricity were in short 
supply, the industrial sector accelerated the pace of structural 
readjustment, technological transformation, and development of 
new products, with the added value reaching 32.4 billion yuan, 
up 10.2 percent over the previous year. Industrial enterprises 
at and above the township level created 15.42 billion yuan in 
profits and taxes, up 15 percent over the previous year, thus 
basically realizing a simultaneous increase in efficiency and 
rate. The growth rate of tertiary industry continued to surpass 
that of the secondary industry, and the added value it created 
reached 39.5 billion yuan, up 12.9 percent over the previous 
year, and its proportion in the gross domestic products rose 
from 44.3 percent in the previous year to 46.4 percent. Under 
the new situation in which production was developed and social 
demands increased, we upheld the principle of "buying products 
from all over the country, selling products to all parts of the 
country, encouraging all parts of the country to build markets 
and sell products in Beijing, serving the whole country, and 
marching towards the world," enriched the markets in the 
capital with plenty of commodities, kept the supply and 
marketing brisk, and realized 54.94 billion yuan in total retail 
sales of commodities, up 27.8 percent over the previous year. 
During the year, we built nine large-scale commercial centers, 
each covering an area of over 10,000 square meters to bring the 
total to 27; increased 44,000 new commercial service networks to 
a total 225,000, thus making things more convenient for the 
masses. Along with economic development, the living conditions 
of the people in the urban and rural areas was greatly improved, 
and if the price rise was factored in, the actual increase in 
the average per-capita wages of staff members and workers across 
the municipality was 7.8 percent; the average per- capita net 
income of peasants actually increased by 5.1 percent. The 
year-end savings deposits of urban and rural residents totaled 
56.07 billion yuan, up 44.2 percent over the previous year. 
  B. Urban and rural construction was quite rapid and new 
changes took place in the capital's appearance. Continued 
efforts were made in unswervingly putting the building of 
infrastructure facilities in the first place, accelerating the 
construction rate, and making an annual investment of 10.36 
billion yuan in this aspect, up 76.2 percent over the previous 
year. We added 415 km of new roads and built 15 overpasses in 
the urban areas. The capital airport expressway which is 
referred to as the first road leading to the country's gate was 
completed and attained international, first-grade standards. 
The east third ring road renovation project was started and 
completed within the same year, alleviating traffic congestion 
in the eastern part of the municipality. The Beijing section of 
the Beijing-Shijiazhuang expressway, Migu Road, Guangning Road, 
and other trunk lines and feeder lines in the urban and rural 
areas, were completed and opened to traffic, making the total 
traffic mileage of the whole municipality exceed 10,000 km, and 
enabling us to prefulfill the stipulated targets set for the 
Eighth Five-Year Plan by two years. New progress was made in 
the construction of the Beijing west passenger train station, 
the no.8 double-track subway line, the west third ring road 
renovation project, and other major projects. 
  The plan for 
the "project of not opening the sluice gate" to meet the power 
consumption peak by the end of 1995 was formulated. The new 
ways of developing electric power in the capital, such as 
jointly conducting power production with Inner Mongolia and 
bringing in foreign capital to build Shijingshan heat and power 
plant, were paved. A half of the second- phase project in 
building the ninth waterworks was accomplished. The first-phase 
project in building Gaobeidian sewage treatment plant whose 
scope is the largest in the country and whose technology and 
equipment are advanced, was accomplished and put into operation. 
Its daily capability of sewage treatment reaches 500,000 tonnes. 
The project of building the second pipe line in north China, 
which is supplying natural gas to Beijing Municipality, was 
accomplished. The newly-increased daily capability of gas supply 
in the year was 150,000 cubic meters and the newly increased 
acreage of areas that enjoyed the heat supply was 2.624 million 
square meters. The newly increased capacity of urban telephone 
exchanges was 360,000 lines and the newly increased number of 
urban telephone consumer households reached 187,000. The number 
of telephones in every 100 persons reached 14 and that in urban 
areas reached 23. The key project of rebuilding the municipal 
post facility that is the largest center of handling the postal 
matters in the country was put into operation. It has greatly 
relieved the strained situation in handling post matters and 
areas inside the second ring road have enjoyed the early 
delivery and sale of newspapers. The acreage of well-built 
houses in both urban and rural areas was 11.544 million square 
meters. The acreage in this regard has surpassed 10 million 
square meters over the past seven years. The municipality also 
mobilized the forces of various social circles to accelerate the 
construction of residential houses. The annual acreage of built 
residential houses reached 6.141 million square meters. The 
acreage in this regard has surpassed 5 million square meters 
over the past seven years. The "plan for having residents 
across Beijing Municipality enjoy sound housing conditions" in 
an effort to help residents overcome their housing difficulties 
caused by their middle and low incomes was formulated. The 
acreage of houses with sound conditions reached 100,000 square 
meters. The construction of satellite cities, county seats, 
towns with trade fair, and new rural villages achieved obvious 
progress. The municipality's rate of forest coverage reached 35 
percent and its urban greening rate reached 30.7 percent. Its 
urban environment was beautified and its living conditions 
improved. In the course of building a modernized city, the 
municipality enhanced consolidation over environmental pollution 
and the protection of the old city's views. 
  C. The undertakings of science, technology, education, 
culture, public health, and sports achieved new progress. Along 
with accelerating modernization in the capital, the thinking of 
regarding science and technology as a prime productive force was 
deeply instilled gradually into the hearts of people. Multiple 
social circles attached great importance to the undertakings of 
science and technology. Scientific and technical plans in 
various fields were smoothly enforced. The municipality scored 
3,024 scientific and technological results in the year and newly 
approved 5,806 patent items. The municipality popularized and 
applied 3,100 scientific and technological results and scored 
better economic results from them. The experiment zone of 
new-tech industrial development, the information industrial base 
in the zone, and the Fengtai and Changping scientific and 
technological parks, achieved rapid development. They have 
become the new rising forces for promoting the development of 
high-and-new-tech industries. The civilian-run scientific and 
technological enterprises achieved new development. The 
municipality scored some new results in integrating social 
science research closely with the new situation prevailing in 
reform, opening up, and modernizations and in deeply carrying 
out theoretical exploration in line with the establishment of 
socialist market economic systems. Education undertakings were 
continuously put in a position of preferential development 
strategy and the quality of education and teaching affairs was 
somewhat upgraded. By persistently following the school 
systems, the leading cadres of municipal level organs went deep 
into the schools on many occasions in the year to conduct their 
official work and to help them deal with their problems. The 
input in education increased. The spending on education set in 
the annual budget was 1.63 billion yuan and its proportion in 
the municipal financial expense was 20.1 percent. The pay of 
teachers, staff members, and workers was continuously upgraded 
and their income level was slightly higher than the average 
income of staff members and workers across the municipality. 
Funds for improving schooling conditions were raised through 
multiple channels. The municipality took the lead in the 
country in basically popularizing the compulsory nine-year 
education and eliminating illiteracy among persons in the prime 
of life. Infant and special education were enhanced. Adult 
education, secondary vocational and technical education, and 
vocational and technical training classes, were carried out 
extensively. The readjustment of courses among higher 
educational institutions began to have effect. Reform in the 
student enrollment systems of middle and primary schools was 
explored and reform in subjects for the college-qualification 
examination achieved smooth progress. Problems that emerged when 
some schools collected fees arbitrarily were cleared. 
Undertakings in literature and art, press and publication, and 
radio and television broadcasting achieved further development. 
A large number of outstanding works that eulogize the 
achievements of reform and opening up and reflect the practical 
life, including "Beijing Citizens in New York" and "The Lane of 
Gala," cropped up. 
  Beijing Television Station provided 
the round-the-clock broadcasting service, and "BEIJING RIBAO" 
and "BEIJING WANBAO" increased its number of pages. Protection 
of cultural relics was valued, and a group of cultural relics of 
the state and the municipal levels were repaired. New results 
were achieved in the patriotic public health campaign and in the 
work concerning medical treatment and health protection. The 
total incidence of major infectious diseases declined for 12 
years running. Education on medical ethics was strengthened, 
and the level of medical treatment and of medical teaching and 
scientific research was enhanced obviously. Marked results were 
achieved in family planning. The undertakings for the 
handicapped garnered universal concern and support of various 
circles in society. With the great trust placed on it by the 
people throughout the country, Beijing successfully hosted the 
Seventh National Games, and the Beijing delegation scored fine 
achievements in the games, thus promoting the development of 
mass sports activities. 
  D. Reform was deepened further and developed towards the new 
stage of effecting overall progress and making breakthroughs in 
key areas. The optimum-scale farming continued to improve, and 
a number of high-efficiency appropriate-scale farms took shape. 
The experiments for the rural share-holding cooperative system 
were expanded steadily, thus instilling new vitality and vigor 
to the development of township and town enterprises as well as 
agriculture. The restrictions on the policies towards mountain 
areas were relaxed by proceeding from the reality, thus 
promoting the development of mountain areas and helping these 
areas become prosperous. The "regulations on changing the 
operational mechanism of state-owned industrial enterprises" and 
the methods to implement the "regulations" were carried out in a 
profound manner, thus accelerating the change of operational 
mechanism of state-owned enterprises. Under the guidance of the 
State Commission for Restructuring Economy, the first light 
industrial general corporation took the lead in carrying out the 
comprehensive reform and explored a new path of invigorating 
large and medium-sized state-owned enterprises. The 
comprehensive reform already extended to first commercial, 
agricultural machinery, aquatic products, food, and building 
materials trades. Tianqiao, Tianlong, Stone, and Beiren 
achieved success in selling their stocks to the places outside 
the municipality and the places outside the territory, thus 
pushing forward the reform of the shareholding system. Reform 
experiments such as enterprise groups, state-owned but 
people-run enterprises, and the shareholding cooperative system 
continued to improve. The sector of the economy not owned by 
the state was developed. Initial results were achieved in the 
reform of the public transportation system, with the contract 
for single cars as the main content. A key step was taken in 
pricing reform, prices of grain and cooking oil were basically 
decontrolled, and the risk-taking storage foundation for major 
agricultural and sideline products was established. The sale 
and transfer of land-use rights with compensation was carried 
out, thus increasing the income and benefit from land resources 
and initially establishing a relatively standardized real estate 
market. Petroleum exchange and commodity exchange were 
established and were successfully operated in line with the 
international standards, with their business volume keeping on 
rising. Monetary market was brisk, and the trading volume of 
negotiable securities reached 15.17 billion yuan. Professional 
personnel and labor service markets of various categories 
developed to 74 in number, and information and consulting 
markets developed rapidly. Markets played an increasingly 
obvious role in regulating economic activities. The program of 
making overall plans for curing major diseases of enterprise 
workers and staff was formulated and began to be tried out in 
Xicheng District, thus accelerating the reform of the social 
security system. The urban housing system reform touching upon 
the personal interests of numerous households was pressed 
forward steadily. On the basis of profound study and 
investigation, the program for reforming Beijing's government 
organs was drawn up, and the public servant training and wage 
reform were carried out step by step. All levels of governments 
cleared up non-permanent organs, streamlined administrative 
procedures, delegated powers to enterprises, positively 
transformed functions, and carried out experiments for the 
reform of the system on management of state-owned assets and 
property. At the same time, the central authorities' measures 
for strengthening and improving macroeconomic regulation and 
control were implemented, and the supervision, monitoring, 
regulation, and control over economic operation were 
strengthened. 
  E. The foreign funds utilized increased obviously, and major 
headway was made in opening up. In 1993, a total of 3,752 
foreign-funded enterprises of three types were newly approved. 
The projects each exceeding $10 million in enterprise scale, 
numbered 200 or more, and the average scale for these projects 
was 2.2 times the 1993 figure. The total number of 
foreign-funded enterprises of three types in the municipality 
reached 7,521, and the foreign capital actually utilized reached 
$2.85 billion. Some world-noted large corporations began making 
investments in Beijing. A number of joint ventures laid 
foundations and started construction in Beijing. Foreign 
investment extended to the spheres of infrastructure, commercial 
facilities, rebuilding of dangerous old houses, tourist 
facilities, and information consulting service. 
  To 
implement foreign investment projects as quickly as possible, 
the municipal government established an office for accelerating 
foreign capital utilization and persisted in the system whereby 
the screening and approval of the projects are a coordinated 
process, thus raising work efficiency. Throughout Beijing, 
1,753 foreign-funded enterprises of the three types went into 
business and became an important force in economic development. 
The three types of foreign-funded enterprises in the Beijing 
Municipal New-Tech Industrial Development Experimental Zone 
increased to 700; the Beijing Economic and Technological 
Development Zone completed the seven components of 
infrastructure and the leveling of ground for the construction 
of its 3.8-square-km start-up area, and 34 enterprises 
well-known at home and abroad "settled down" in the zone; 
infrastructural construction of district and county small 
industrial zones was accelerated, and 1,312 projects were 
already in these zones. The rapid and healthy development of 
the various development zones and small industrial zones became 
the new growth points for urban and rural economy. Foreign 
trade was expanded continuously, with the annual imports and 
exports totaling $3.08 billion, up 38.1 percent. Of the total, 
the volume of exports was $1.7 billion, up 10.9 percent, which 
was the largest annual increase in exports in our history. The 
quality of export commodities was improved, the proportion of 
the commodities with high added value increased, and the export 
market diversified. Another 55 enterprises obtained the import 
and export authority, the exports of the three types of 
foreign-funded enterprises amounted to 20.6 percent of the total 
exports of Beijing, and a new pattern of exports through 
multiple channels took shape. Overseas enterprises and 
construction projects and labor service cooperation undertaken 
abroad made new headway. Overseas tourists totaled 2.027 
million, and foreign exchange income from tourism was $1.24 
billion, an all-time record. Friendly exchanges with foreign 
countries became even more vigorous, and friendly ties were 
established with the capitals of four countries in the year. 
  F. We strengthened the socialist spiritual civilization, 
democracy, and the legal system. Taking advantage of the 
distribution of the third volume of the "Selected Works of Deng 
Xiaoping," we extensively created an upsurge in studying the 
theory of building socialism with Chinese characteristics and 
further unified the thinking of cadres and the masses. In 
connection with the activities to mark the centennial of Mao 
Zedong's birth, we conducted the education on patriotism, 
collectivism, socialism, and outlook on life and value among the 
masses, especially youths, and achieved fairly good results. 
Although we failed by two votes in the bid to host the 2000 
Olympic Games due to numerous reasons, our bidding activities 
has increased the world's understanding about China and our 
understanding of the world, enabled us to make many friends, 
expanded our influence, enhanced the unity of the Chinese 
nation, uplifted our national spirit, and inspired the 
confidence and determination of our millions upon millions of 
people to go all out to make the country strong and build 
socialism with Chinese characteristics. The activities to 
present 100 educational movies on patriotic themes, to appraise 
and select advanced and model persons, and to "tour, love, and 
build Beijing" yielded a good social effect. A number of 
persons, such as Gao Sanxi, were praised by the masses for their 
heroic and model deeds and became the models for the people of 
various nationalities throughout Beijing to learn from. A vast 
number of people actively participated in the donations to the 
"hope project" designed to help children who were forced to 
discontinue schooling due to poverty. Prohibition against the 
firing of firecrackers won the understanding and support of the 
masses and was a success. Notable progress was achieved in 
national defense education, conscription work, and building of 
national defense reserve forces; the double-support work and 
army-police- civilian joint efforts in building civilized units 
were intensified; and building of grass-roots civilized units 
again made new headway. In improving the socialist democracy and 
legal system, governments at all levels in Beijing voluntarily 
subjected themselves to the supervision of people's congresses 
and their standing committees and adhered to the system of 
democratic consultation by the Chinese People's Political 
Consultative Conference [CPPCC] committees, democratic parties, 
and persons without party affiliation. We handled and replied 
to 2,154 motions and suggestions submitted by people's deputies 
and CPPCC members in the year and strengthened the work to 
solicit suggestions, people's letters and visits, and telephone 
calls to the mayor. We conscientiously implemented the party's 
policies on nationalities and religions and maintained the 
harmonious relations between various nationalities, political 
unity and cooperation, and mutual respect in religious belief, 
thus consolidating a stable and united situation. The 
advantages of the work concerning Overseas Chinese affairs and 
the work directed to Taiwan were developed to make new 
contributions to the construction of the capital. New 
experiences were gained in managing the city according to law. 
  The pace of formulating and perfecting the local rules was 
accelerated. Thirteen draft local rules and regulations were 
submitted to the municipal people's congress standing committee 
for examination and discussion during the year. The dynamics of 
enforcing administrative laws were expanded. Efforts were made 
to examine the situation of enforcing 15 laws, rules, and 
regulations. Through conscientious preparations, the people's 
policemen made their rounds to examine, on a trial basis, the 
enforcement of laws and were appraised by the people. The 
propaganda on popularizing the general knowledge of laws was 
extensively carried out. The number of persons who died from 
six kinds of abnormal accidents continued to be reduced. We 
mobilized the forces of all social circles to comprehensively 
improve social order; continued to wage special struggles 
against serious criminal offenders, "pornography," the "six 
vices," and "fake products;" cracked a number of cases of 
serious crimes; eliminated a group of criminal gangs; and 
safeguarded the stability of the capital. 
  G. Achievements in waging the current-stage struggle against 
corruption were made. Last year, the central authorities made a 
decision on opposing corruption. The Beijing Municipal CPC 
Committee paid high attention to the decision, and the 
governments at various levels conscientiously implemented it. 
Simultaneously, the broad masses of the people positively 
implemented the decision and also helped the governments 
overcome and correct corrosive phenomena. The municipality made 
achievements in fulfilling the three tasks for opposing 
corruption as defined by the central authorities. The majority 
of the units adopted a conscientious attitude toward the 
struggle and made better achievements. However, a small number 
of the units failed to do their jobs well and even perfunctorily 
and superficially engaged themselves in the struggle. The major 
achievements in opposing corruption and advocating 
administrative honesty are as follows: First, the government 
organs at various levels across the municipality and the cadres 
of the administrative and law enforcement departments at or 
above the section level generally convened the democratic 
activities in line with the central authorities' five 
regulations on administrative honesty and self-discipline and 
made self-investigations and self-corrections. Most of the 
problems that had been found out were resolved. Second, a large 
number of major and appalling cases were conscientiously 
investigated and handled. From September to December, the 
municipality investigated and handled 101 major cases of 
corruption and bribery each involving over 10,000 yuan in 
money, made public 37 major and appalling cases, and handled 46 
serious economic criminals according to laws. Third, the 
unhealthy trends of state organs abusing power to wantonly 
collect charges were basically controlled. The departments 
concerned under the municipal government canceled 211 items on 
unreasonable collection of charges, and the district and county 
governments canceled 341 unreasonable charge collection items. 
In the struggle against corruption, the governments at various 
levels reported the situation to the people's congresses, the 
CPPCC organizations, democratic parties, and the masses and 
accepted their supervision. At the same time, we combined 
administrative honesty with administrative diligence according 
to the requirements for "grasping administrative honesty to 
promote administrative diligence," did more good and concrete 
deeds for the people, and narrowed the distance in the 
relationship between the government and the people. 
  By reviewing the work done in the previous year, we deeply 
experienced that to achieve the work of the capital, we must 
persistently take Comrade Deng Xiaoping's theory on building a 
socialism with Chinese characteristics as a guidance, 
comprehensively implement the basic line of the party, 
ceaselessly emancipate the mind, proceed from reality, seek 
truth from facts, and boldly make explorations. Only by so 
doing will we have new ideas, make great accomplishments, and 
ceaselessly create a new situation in reform and construction. 
Only when we persist in the Marxist viewpoint that development 
is an essential criterion, firmly grasp the central link of 
economic construction, and enhance the sense of urgency for 
grasping the favorable opportunities will we be able to bring 
our advantages into play, ceaselessly break obstacles, overcome 
difficulties, and make development in all undertakings. So long 
as we persist in the purpose of wholeheartedly serving the 
people, carefully experience and observe the people's feeling, 
engage in less talk but more work, do solid work, 
conscientiously help the people solve their practical problems, 
and set the highest possible standards to be attained by the 
government, will we be able to enjoy the trust and support of 
the people and lay a firm foundation for our work. Only when we 
pay high attention to safeguarding the situation characterized 
by stability and unity and resolutely deal blows to the 
phenomena of damaging stability and hindering unity will we be 
able to consolidate the established achievements and ensure the 
smooth realization of the capital's grand blueprint for 
socialist modernization. 
  Fellow deputies, the great achievements in building the 
capital over the past year were the results of the united 
efforts of the people of various nationalities across the 
municipality on the basis of the good work in the past. Here, 
let me extend heartfelt thanks on behalf of the municipal 
government to the broad masses of workers, peasants, cadres, and 
intellectuals who actively participated in the capital's 
socialist modernization drive, to deputies, CPPCC members, and 
personages from various democratic parties, mass organizations, 
and all social circles for their great support and supervision, 
and to central units stationed in Beijing, fraternal provinces, 
prefectures, and cities, the People's Liberation Army, and the 
armed police force who greatly supported our work, and to 
compatriots from Taiwan, Hong Kong, and Macao, Overseas Chinese 
compatriots, and international friends who cared for and 
supported the development of the capital. 
  While affirming the achievements, we should soberly 
recognize 
that there are still many difficulties and problems on our road 
of advance, and there are shortcomings and deficiencies in the 
government work. The prominent ones were: The funds were in 
short supply; the infrastructure facitilies, such as power and 
gas supply, communications and telecommunications, were still 
far from meeting the needs of the development of production and 
the people's living; a considerable number of state-owned large 
and medium-sized enterprises still could not extricate 
themselves from the difficult position of earning low profits 
and suffering deficits; the rise in the retail price index was 
quite high and the rise reached 16.9 percent; there were many 
inconveniences and prominent difficulties in the life of the 
masses; the quality of some small housing community projects was 
not high, the supporting facilities were imperfect, and the 
dismantling and relocation work was not well implemented in some 
places; some places lacked relevant systems, laws, regulations, 
and methods in the management of the inflow of transients, trade 
fairs, and environmental protection and sanitation, and failed 
to follow and strictly enforce laws; some units, particularly 
some leading organs, failed to pay full attention to spiritual 
civilization, allowing the phenomenon of being tough with one 
hand and soft with the other hand to exist; although great 
efforts were made in public security work, the situation was not 
optimistic, and serious cases increased in number; the problems 
of overstaffed government organs and low working efficiency 
still could not be fundamentally solved, some leading organs and 
leading cadres still practiced formalism and bureaucratic work 
style at varying degrees, some cadres even abused their powers 
to seek personal gains, a small number of people were morally 
degenerated, violated law and discipline, and seriously damaged 
the flesh-blood relationship between the government and the 
masses of people. We should pay great attention to these 
problems and conscientiously solve them, and we earnestly hope 
that all deputies will give criticism and suggestions. 
<H5>  2. The Work of 1994 </H5>
  The year 1994 is a crucial one for implementing the decision 
of the third plenary session of the 14th party Central Committee 
and establishing the socialist market economic structure, and an 
important year for accelerating the capital's socialist 
modernization drive in accordance with the demand of the State 
Council's written reply on the "Beijing urban overall plan." 
The CPC Central Committee has comprehensively analyzed the 
situation at home and abroad and defined this year's basic 
principles for the work of the whole party and the whole 
country: It is necessary to take the theory of Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping on building socialism with Chinese characteristics and 
the party's basic line as the guidance, comprehensively 
implement the guidelines of the 14th party congress and the 
third plenary session of the 14th party Central Committee, 
accelerate the establishment of the socialist market economic 
structure, maintain a sustained, rapid, and sound national 
economic development, maintain political stability, and promote 
comprehensive social progress. The overall situation of the 
work of the whole party and the whole country is to seize the 
opportunity, deepen reform, expand opening up, promote 
development, and maintain stability. Governments at all levels 
across the municipality should submit their work to and serve 
this overall situation, grasp the situation, exert efforts to 
accomplish something, and continue to push the capital's all 
construction undertakings forward. 
  Last October, the State Council approved the newly revised 
"Beijing urban overall plan," and issued an important 
eight-point written rely. This is a blueprint for guiding the 
capital's development for this century and next and an 
scientific basis for urban construction and management. The 
overall plan proposed: By the year 2010, Beijing's social 
development, and the economic, scientific, and technological 
comprehensive strength should attain or even surpass the the 
level of capital cities of the moderately developed countries in 
some aspects, thus laying a foundation for building Beijing 
into a first-grade modernized international city by the middle 
of the 21st century. 
  We should thoroughly publicize and 
resolutely implement the overall plan, most extensively mobilize 
the forces of the people of various nationalities in Beijing, 
make each year's work a success, and march toward the grand goal 
of modernizing the capital in a down-to-earth manner. 
  In line with the central instructions, the guidelines of the 
second session of the eighth National People's Congress, the 
resolution on fulfilling the major tasks of the 10-year program 
three years ahead of schedule and attaining the strategic target 
of a fairly comfortable life approved at the first session of 
the 10th municipal people's congress, and the specific 
conditions of Beijing, we should put the endeavor to maintain 
stability in the capital above everything else, handle the 
relationship between reform, development, and stability well, 
further emancipate the mind, firmly seize the opportunity, 
achieve breakthroughs in key areas, and make a bigger stride in 
reform and construction to achieve a fairly comfortable life 
ahead of schedule. The major targets of Beijing's economic and 
social development are to achieve a 10-percent increase in terms 
of comparable prices in the gross domestic product to make it 99 
billion yuan, which, translated, means a 3.5-percent increase in 
primary industry, 9.8-percent increase in secondary industry, 
and 11.5-percent increase in tertiary industry; and to actively 
promote science and technology, education, and other social 
undertakings and further strengthen the socialist spiritual 
civilization, democracy, and legal system to further improve 
people's material and cultural life. 
  A. We should make great efforts to adjust the structure and 
improve efficiency to bring about sustained, rapid, and healthy 
economic development. 
  One of the basic targets put forward in Beijing's overall 
urban plan is to establish an economy which is led by high and 
new technology, in which the tertiary industry is developed, the 
industrial composition is rational, and efficiency and quality 
are high, and which conforms to the characteristics of the 
capital. Focusing on upgrading the quality and efficiency of 
economic growth, we should make great efforts to adjust the 
structure, develop an economy compatible with the 
characteristics of the capital, and maintain sustained, rapid, 
and healthy economic development this year. 
  Agriculture, which concerns the national economy and 
people's 
livelihood, is the major work influencing the overall situation. 
The more modern the city becomes, the more we should consolidate 
the position of agriculture as the foundation and make efforts 
to develop agriculture successfully. We should resolutely 
implement the guidelines of the central rural work conference 
and make sure that this year's grain output is stabilized, 
per-unit yields are raised, and major nonstaple food continues 
to increase. To attain this, we should continue to improve the 
policies in support of agriculture, speed up formulation of 
regulations on protection of basic farmland, and conscientiously 
protect cultivated land. We should intensify construction of 
nonstaple food production bases, make the "vegetable basket" 
project a success, adhere to the principle of "making outer 
suburbs the major vegetable producers, increasing the vegetable 
production of outskirt areas, and regulating vegetable supplies 
by importing from other localities," and increase the areas sown 
to vegetables by 150,000 mu. We should continue to increase 
agricultural investment and raise funds from various channels to 
support agricultural development. We should further reduce the 
burdens on peasants to protect peasants' interests. We should 
persist in developing agriculture through the application of 
science and technology and promotion of education and stabilize 
and strengthen the contingent of agricultural scientific and 
technical personnel. We should actively explore the new road of 
rural reform and, proceeding from the reality of Beijing's 
suburbs, further improve and develop the method of operation on 
as large a scale as possible in the economically developed plain 
areas, promote the coordinated process of production, 
processing, and marketing, bring about high yields, high 
quality, and high efficiency in agriculture by raising labor 
productivity by a large margin, and then increase peasants' 
income. In economically underdeveloped areas, we should 
continue to stabilize and improve the household- based 
output-related contract responsibility system but should never 
seek uniformity in the forms we adopted. We should continue to 
improve the farm and sideline product distribution system, speed 
up construction of central wholesale markets for farm and 
sideline products and specialized wholesale markets for grain, 
meat, and vegetables, increase reserves, and maintain a rational 
stock. Township enterprises should add impetus to the reform 
designed to establish the shareholding system, improve their 
management, and continue to "expand their scale, adopt a new 
layout, develop the export-oriented economy, and adopt new 
mechanisms, new technology, and new equipment." 
  We should 
actively promote the construction of central towns with trade 
fairs and new rural villages. In line with the principles of 
"building up the mountainous areas with the money earned from 
business established in outside places," "entering markets in 
order to become better-off," and of "living off the mountain 
when living on a mountain," we should delegate more 
self-determination rights to mountainous areas in the fields of 
land management and development and in production. Efforts 
should be made to accelerate, in an overall way, the progress of 
rural areas in becoming better-off by integrating the 
introduction of funds, technologies, and talented personnel with 
the establishment of enterprises in flatland; and by opening the 
mountainous areas and natural resources to outside places and 
developing the production to gradually reduce the economic gap 
between mountainous and flat areas. 
  According to the principle of concentrated high technology 
of 
high additional value, the less energy consumption, the less 
water consumption, the less pollution, the less transport 
volume, and the less land occupation of products, industrial 
enterprises should keep markets in view; readjust their 
structure; and increase their economic results. Efforts should 
be made to extensively apply new technologies to improving the 
traditional industries to accelerate the readjustment of 
technological structure and product mix. By adopting effective 
measures, we should promote the development of the three pillar 
industries of motor vehicles, electronics, and new building 
materials, as well as of backbone industries. We should conduct 
reform in the existing managerial system of auto industry and 
reinforce the investment made in the industry so as to enable 
the principal leading products of automobiles to be improved in 
standardization and level, to accelerate their replacement and 
renewal, and to meet the demands of markets. Electronic 
industries should concentrate their forces in various fields on 
organizing enterprise groups by regarding their products that 
enjoy brisk sales as a guide, accelerate the enforcement of the 
"electronic town" plan in Jiuxianqiao, and do a good job in 
grasping the key projects of producing video camera and 
program-control telephone exchanges. Industries in charge of 
producing new building materials should intensify their work of 
building the "building material town" in Xisanqi and of inviting 
business and bringing in capital from foreign countries. 
Meanwhile, efforts should be made to ensure the construction of 
the ethylene plant in the year and to concentrate efforts on 
building a large number of key projects, including the heat 
rolling mill. We should accelerate the technical progress of 
enterprises and enable the major equipment of one-third key 
enterprises to achieve replacement and renewal this year and to 
improve their technical level. Enterprises should fully 
understand the new situation in which China is going to restore 
the position of original signatory state to the GATT treaty, 
actively readjust their products' mix in line with the demands 
of both domestic and foreign markets, improve their products' 
quality, enforce the international standard, enhance their 
competitive capability, and create more products that enjoy 
brisk sales and have famous trademarks. 
  We should accelerate the establishment of a tertiary 
industrial system that serves the capital, keeps the country and 
the world in view, is complete with functions and rational 
allocation, and renders first-grade service. The municipality 
plans to have the increased value of tertiary industries account 
for 47.5 percent in the municipal gross domestic product this 
year and to have social retail sales show a 20 percent increase. 
Efforts should be continuously made to support and encourage 
the development of industries and trade of finance, insurance, 
technical trade, communication and transportation, post and 
telecommunications, information and consultation, and tourism. 
The construction of financial street should be accelerated. In 
line with the principles of formulating unified plans, making 
rational allocation, and meeting the demands of different 
consumers, we should push forward in an overall way the 
construction and rebuilding of commercial service facilities in 
various fields. We should ensure the complete construction and 
operation of 10 large shopping centers with acreage of over 
10,000 square meters. Efforts should be continuously made to 
develop small commercial networks and centers that are 
convenient for the people; to vigorously reform the old business 
areas in the downtown area and a large number of district-run 
shopping centers; and try to open supermarkets, chain stores, 
and commodity distributing centers that are suitable to the 
consumption characteristics of the country. We should 
accelerate the construction of indoor trade fairs and gradually 
enable peddlers to bring their outdoors business indoors. The 
role of the large wholesale enterprises should be brought into 
play. The level of modernizing the storage facilities at 
various fields should be upgraded and their storage capability 
should be enhanced. 
  Fellow deputies: Boosting the large and medium-sized 
enterprises represents not only the key to maintaining 
sustained, rapid, and healthy development of the national 
economy and the foundation of establishing the systems of 
socialist market economy but also a decisive role in 
safeguarding social stability. Reasons for the difficulties 
encountered by some enterprises at present and for the poor 
economic results scored by these enterprises are of problems in 
their business mechanism and also of their social burdens, their 
left-over troubles, and their poor internal management. 
  We 
should have the greatest determination, exert utmost efforts, 
and wholeheartedly rely on the working class to improve large 
and medium-sized state-owned enterprises through every possible 
means. This year, we will adopt the following measures. First, 
we will conscientiously disseminate the experiences of the First 
Light Industrial General Corporation, add impetus to the 
adjustment of the industrial composition and product mix in 
coordination with the adjustment of the functions of urban land 
use, and optimize land resources to lead enterprise development. 
Second, we will accelerate reform of the social security 
system, improve the external environment for the production and 
operation of enterprises, conscientiously reduce the burden on 
enterprises, and facilitate the transformation of their 
operating mechanism. Third, we will continue to increase 
investment, organize forces to tackle major scientific and 
technological difficulties, and expedite enterprises' technical 
transformation. We will consolidate and develop those with 
large profits and taxes and give them preferential treatment in 
terms of policies and funds so that the number of such 
enterprises increases. Fourth, we will apply the leadership 
responsibility system to the study of the different conditions 
of the enterprises which lose money or earn meager profits and 
adopt measures commensurate with their specific conditions to 
promote their development. Enterprises capable of reducing 
deficits and increasing profits should be supported so that they 
can extricate themselves from the difficult situation and 
achieve development. Those which hold no promise of reducing 
deficits and whose assets cannot pay off their debts should 
close, suspend production, merge with others, or change their 
production lines more rapidly, and, after experiments, some of 
them should go bankrupt according to law. Meanwhile, the life 
and reemployment of their staff members and workers of should be 
properly arranged. Fifth, we will formulate policies to bravely 
lead enterprises out of their difficult situation through 
diverse production, joint management, introduction of funds from 
abroad, "multiple systems at one plant," and the shareholding 
system. Sixth, enterprises should make painstaking efforts to 
improve themselves, strengthen management, lower production 
cost, reduce material consumption, and pursue better efficiency 
through better management. 
  B. Focusing on Infrastructural Facilities and Residential 
Housing Construction, We Should Accelerate Urban Construction 
and Greatly Strengthen Management of the City. 
  In urban construction, we should take the overall plan and 
the written reply of the State Council as the guide, consider it 
a requirement to build a modernized international city, and 
persist in the two strategic shifts, namely shifting the focus 
of urban construction from the city proper to outer suburbs and 
shifting the focus of the construction of city proper from 
building new projects to adjustment and renovation. This is the 
key to raising the urban and rural modernization level. 
  Infrastructural facilities are the prerequisite which the 
city relies on for its survival and development. The earlier 
and more actively we pay attention to them, the better it will 
be. We should concentrate efforts on weak links and strive for 
new breakthroughs. we should attach great importance to and 
achieve success in the development of the power industry of the 
capital. To make sure that shortage in power will be eliminated 
by the end of 1995, we year step up cooperation with the Inner 
Mongolia Autonomous Region this year in power development 
projects and the construction of the Shijingshan Power Plant, 
the Mingling pumped-storage hydroelectric station, and other 
power projects. We should continue to promote road construction 
and, within this year, complete the renovation of the northwest 
third ring road and the Fushi Road, the construction of the 
sidewalk facilities on Changan Street, and the construction of 
the Jingtong, Jingzhang, and Shunping highways. The Beijing 
West Railway Station should take an initial shape within this 
year, and double tracking of the eight subway lines should be 
accelerated. The second-phase project of the No. 9 Water Works 
should be completed. Key gas and heat supply projects, such as 
the gas increase of the coking plant and the expansion of the 
Zuojiazhuang Heat Supply Plant, should be made successful to 
increase fuel gas consumers by 120,000 and increase the floor 
space with central heat supply systems by 2 million square 
meters. We should step up the beginning stages of preparations 
for the supply of natural gas from Shaanxi, Gansu, and Ningxia 
to Beijing and the project to "divert water from the south to 
the north." We should greatly develop post and 
telecommunication, change all the switchboards in urban and 
outskirt areas into program-controlled ones within this year, 
and increase urban telephone subscribers by 300,000 to alleviate 
the difficulty in "installing telephones." 
  Only a secure life can guarantee a happy life. Improving 
the housing conditions is the strong desire of the broad masses 
of people and the key to realizing a better life is one of the 
priorities of the government work of this year. Recently, 
Beijing has continued to build a great number of residential 
houses, but is still far from meeting the needs. At present, a 
considerable number of residents in cities and towns are living 
in a crowded place with very poor conditions. We must step up 
our efforts to implement the project of building houses with 
sound conditions. This year, the houses which are completed and 
commissioned and with sound living conditions must not be less 
than 300,000 square meters. Continued efforts should be made to 
grasp the renovation of dangerous and old houses and the 
development of new housing communities, and gradually increase 
the proportion of housing construction projects in outlying and 
suburban areas, especially in satellite cities. The completed 
housing areas during the year should exceed 6.5 million square 
meters. It is necessary to guarantee the quality of 
construction projects, pay great attention to solving the 
problems of residents in the supply of electricity, gas, water, 
heating, communications, and telecommunications, and ensure 
that, in the course of building new houses, the main part of a 
construction project and the urban administrative service 
facilities are built simultaneously. While doing a good job in 
building residential houses, we should continue to deepen reform 
of the housing system in an effort to accelerate the pace of 
solving the housing problems of residents in cities and towns. 
We should strengthen efforts to grasp the building of key 
public facilities. In building new projects in the cities, we 
should pay attention to protecting the style of the old capital 
and manifesting the spirit of the times, national traditions, 
and local distinctive features. 
  The work of making the environment green and beautiful and 
raising the quality of the environment is the basic urban 
construction project which must be grasped with unremitting 
efforts. This year, in order to realize the objective of making 
the municipal forest coverage rate reach 40 percent by the end 
of this century, we should extensively, deeply, and solidly, 
conduct all-people voluntary tree-planting activities, continue 
to build tracts of forests to separate the city from other 
localities and sanitation protection forests, and plant trees 
along 15 roads, including the third ring road, and residential 
areas, such as Fangzhuang. In the suburban areas, we should 
plant trees on barren hills, beaches, and areas plagued by wind 
and sand, make the overall environment green, and actively 
develop flower industry. It is necessary to punish in line with 
law acts of misappropriating green areas and damaging forests 
and green projects in an effort to check the seizure of green 
isolated areas. We should attend to the building of key 
projects, such as the second phase of the Gaobeidian water 
disposal plant project, Asuwei trash disposal area, and other 
environmental protection projects, do a good job in cutting off 
the polluted water of Liangshui He and harnessing the Tonghui 
He, further improve water, air, and sound pollution, and 
strengthen the pollution-free disposal and comprehensive use of 
wastes and discarded things. On the basis of improving the 
environment, we should strengthen the building of water 
conservancy projects in urban and rural areas and the protection 
of natural resources. 
  Without well-organized scientific management, it is 
impossible to realize the objective of building a modern, 
international city. Particularly under the situation in which 
the pace of urban construction is being accelerated, we need all 
the more to strengthen urban management. Planning is the 
"dragon head" of construction. We must follow the plan in 
carrying out construction projects, strictly follow the 
construction procedures, never yield to those who carry out 
unauthorized construction projects, and strictly punish them. 
We should improve traffic routes, strengthen traffic 
management, strictly enforce traffic laws and regulations, and 
maintain good traffic order. We should rely on the masses of 
people and professional law-enforcement departments, give full 
play to the functions of neighborhood offices, residents' 
committees and villagers' committees in comprehensive management 
and service, comprehensively check the acts of arbitrarily 
setting up stalls, misappropriating roads, and throwing trash on 
the ground that seriously affect the order of the municipality, 
and strive to greatly improve the city's appearance amd 
sanitation, and improve the environment of small residential 
areas. Meanwhile, we should strengthen the building of an urban 
disaster prevention system, do a good job in meteorological 
work, and strictly protect military facilities. 
  C. We should actively develop scientific, technological, 
educational, and cultural undertakings and promote a 
comprehensive social progress. 
  Science and technology are the primary productive forces, 
economic construction must rely on science and technology, and 
scientific and technological work must serve economic 
construction. We should give full play to the scientific and 
technological advantages of the capital, concentrate efforts on 
tackling difficult scientific and technical problems, and 
promote the progress of research, development, and 
industrialization of high and new technology. 
  Corresponding policies should be formulated and effective 
measures be adopted according to new circumstances to promote 
the development of new technology industrial development and 
experimental zones. The priorities for scientific and 
technological reform and development this year are as follows: 
First, the law on scientific and technological progress should 
be carried out in an all-round way, and the input in science and 
technology should increase. Second, effort should be made to 
establish a new type of structure that is suitable for the 
development of socialist market economy and for scientific and 
technological law and that closely combines science and 
technology with the economy. Efforts should also be made to 
stabilize the basic research, the research in applied sciences, 
and the research in new and high technology. Scientific and 
technological development institutes should be given a free hand 
and be encouraged to integrate themselves with enterprises in a 
bid to march towards the markets and enhance their development 
vitality. Third, scientific research and development should be 
strengthened, all trades of the national economy should be armed 
with advanced technology, traditional industries should be 
renovated with new and high technology, scientific and 
technological achievements should be translated into practical 
productive forces rapidly, and the important role of science and 
technology in invigorating large and medium-sized state-owned 
enterprises should be given into full play. Fourth, the scale of 
industrialization of science and technology should be expanded 
continuously. The "program for industrializing new and high 
technology" should be formulated and implemented. With the 
communications industry, power and electronics industries, 
computer, and bioengineering as key trades, new technology 
industrial development zones should guide scientific and 
technological enterprises to organize groups, carry out 
shareholding system, industrialize themselves, and march towards 
international markets. Construction of the biological city of 
Beijing University and of the power and electronics industrial 
base should be accelerated. Fifth, positive support and 
encouragement should be given to create even more and even 
better popular science works, rich and colorful popular science 
publications should be initiated, scientific and technological 
museums should be established, and scientific and technological 
knowledge should be made universal among the vast numbers of the 
masses, youths and children in particular. 
  The strategic principle on developing education on a 
priority 
basis should be upheld, and the "program for China's educational 
reform and development" should be implemented resolutely. With 
the improvement of educational and teaching quality as the core, 
the educational reform should be deepened continuously, and more 
investment should be made in education with a view to promoting 
the development of educational undertakings. Compulsory 
education should be run with the government investment 
primarily, and, at the same time, the society and the people 
should be encouraged to raise funds to run this education. On 
the basis of making the compulsory education universal 
basically, attention should be paid to consolidating and 
improving the compulsory education, and great efforts should be 
exerted to resolve the problem concerning the peak of students 
entering middle schools so as to avoid the emergence of the 
two-shift system. At the same time, the education at the senior 
middle school stage should develop vigorously, and various 
circles in society should be fully mobilized to utilize such 
modernized communication means as radio and television to 
develop vocational education, adult education, and all kinds of 
social education with a view to training practical professionals 
and the scarce professionals in line with market demands. 
Higher educational departments should reform the system of 
running universities and colleges, accelerate the readjustment 
of the layout of universities and colleges and the structure of 
disciplines, expand the autonomy of universities and colleges, 
and positively and appropriately reform the systems concerning 
enrollment, tuition collection, and graduate employment. The 
pre-school education and special education should develop 
continuously. All schools should persist in the principle of 
promoting the moral, intellectual, and physical development of 
students, and should strengthen and improve moral education in 
order to train competent professionals for the socialist 
modernization. To vitalize the nation, the hope lies in 
education, and to vitalize education, the hope lies in teachers. 
The "PRC's law on teachers" should be implemented 
conscientiously, and the drawing-up of the detailed rules for 
implementing this law should be completed by the end of this 
year. All levels of governments and all pertinent departments 
should focus their educational investment on building the ranks 
of teachers with a view to improving remunerations and housing 
conditions for teachers and raising the social position of 
teachers. Attention should be paid to teacher-training 
education to expand the source of teachers, improve the quality 
of teachers, build up a contingent of teachers who are advanced 
in ideology, excellent in professional knowledge, and devoted to 
the people's educational undertakings. The fine habit of 
respecting teachers and education should be formed throughout 
the society in order to make teaching an occupation most 
respected by the people. 
  Economic development depends on science and technology. 
Scientific and technological competition depends on skilled 
persons. We should bring into full play Beijing's advantages of 
having a galaxy of talents, adopt various forms and ways to 
cultivate a large number of specialized talents and laborers 
with modernized production techniques, and cultivate a group of 
academic and technical leaders spanning this century and the 
next. It is necessary to combine the cultivation of skilled 
persons with the reasonable use of skilled persons. We should 
boldly break rules to select and promote the skilled persons 
with prominent contributions, give heavy awards to them, give 
priorities to improving their working and living conditions, and 
create environments and conditions for bringing into full play 
the skilled persons' talents and having the people of talents 
coming forth in large numbers. We should continue to encourage 
and attract overseas skilled persons to serve the modernization 
of the motherland and the capital. 
  Beijing is a cultural center of the country. So, Beijing's 
standards for developing cultural undertakings must be high, and 
the cultural undertakings should be developing rapidly. The 
governments at various levels must pay high attention to 
cultural undertakings and enthusiastically support the cultural 
departments' reform and development. Each and every principal 
leader of the municipality should directly establish contacts 
with a literature and art organization to deeply conduct 
investigations and study and solve the practical problems 
cropping up in literary and artistic development. Priorities 
should be given to supporting and protecting the national 
cultural essences, excellent lofty and refined arts, and 
high-value academic works. This year, literary and artistic, 
press and publication, and radio and television departments 
should strive to select another group of excellent works 
enthusiastically singing the praises of reform, opening up, and 
modernization. It is necessary to bring into full play the 
functions of libraries, cultural centers, museums, exhibition 
halls, scientific and technological centers, and archives. We 
should accelerate the construction of such cultural facilities 
in the capital as libraries. We should continue to achieve the 
scientific protection and reasonable utilization of relics and 
appropriately open and also ceaselessly perfect the relic 
markets. We should positively conduct various forms of healthy 
mass cultural activities and enliven the urban and rural 
people's cultural activities. We should strengthen the 
management of cultural markets according to laws, wipe out 
feudalist superstition and pornographic audio-video tapes and 
books, and purify the cultural environment. 
  We should carry out the policy of putting prevention first 
in 
medical work and further develop medical and public health 
undertakings. We should mobilize all social forces to further 
extensively conduct the patriotic and public health campaign of 
"striving to create a sanitation city." We should effectively 
control the occurrence of major infectious diseases and strictly 
examine the hygiene of food production and management units. We 
should positively achieve the medical work of the rural areas, 
develop the rural cooperative medical treatment system, 
consolidate three-level medical treatment and health care 
networks, and realize the target that everyone enjoys primary 
health care. We should persist in the construction of rural 
medical institutes and hospitals in the rural areas and 
fundamentally change the situation that the rural areas, 
particularly border, remote, and mountain areas, lack doctors 
and medicines. It is necessary to promote the reform of the 
medical treatment and public health spheres, to strengthen the 
improvement of medical ethics, and to upgrade the medical 
treatment quality and the medical service level. We should 
positively support the development of the undertakings for the 
handicapped. We should realistically achieve the work toward 
the aged people. We should conscientiously implement the 
regulations on family planning, particularly strengthen the 
management of birth control among the floating population and 
the people in the rural areas, persist in healthy birth and 
sound upbringing, and continue to control the population growth 
rate. 
  We should positively explore the reform of the sports 
management system in the new situation and promote the 
socialization of sports. We should extensively conduct the mass 
sports activities, carry out the all-people health care plan, 
and strive to upgrade the health quality of the people. 
  D. We should conscientiously solve the practical problems in 
the people's livelihood and ensure a stable improvement of the 
people's living standards. 
  Ceaselessly upgrading the people's material and cultural 
lives is the fundamental purpose of developing the socialist 
economy as well as a point to start with and end the government 
work. This year, the governments at various levels should focus 
their efforts on achieving two matters relating to the people's 
livelihood. First, the excessively faster increase in goods 
prices should be controlled. Second, the governments should try 
every possible means to resolve the living difficulties of the 
staff members and workers with low incomes. 
  During a recent period, the prices of the basic daily 
necessities rose quite rapidly, becoming one of the hot topics 
for discussion by the people. The party Central Committee and 
the State Council have attached great attention to this. The 
municipal party committee and the government believed that after 
basically decontrolling the prices, we must never give up 
adjusting and managing the commodity prices, resolutely adopt 
effective measures on our own initiative, comprehensively apply 
economic, legal, and necessary administrative means, and try by 
all possible means to control prices, particularly the rise of 
prices of farm and sideline products. First, we should 
implement the system of mayors and district and county heads 
assuming responsibility, exert strenuous efforts to grasp the 
"vegetable basket project," expand the production of grain, 
oil-bearing crops, vegetables, meat, eggs, milk, poultry, fish, 
and other major farm and sideline products, and guarantee supply 
and the relatively stable prices. Second, we should invigorate 
the circulation of commodities, reduce circulation links, reduce 
expenses, strengthen ties with the producing areas, and attract 
more commodities to enter Beijing. Third, we should establish 
and improve the major farm and sideline products storage system 
and the market risk-taking funds, do a good job in handling and 
regulating the products, and more promptly and effectively 
stabilize the excessively high prices. Fourth, we should seize 
the opportunity and strength of controlling commodity prices. 
On the premise of guaranteeing the steady issuance of central 
measures for adjusting prices, it is necessary to strictly 
control the municipal pricing reform items to be issued this 
year. Regarding those items which must be issued this year, we 
should control the range of adjusting prices, properly arrange 
subsidies for staff members and workers, and carefully organize 
the implementation of this work. When the changes in the prices 
of the people's daily necessities and services are too frequent 
and the range of adjusting prices is too high, the price 
departments should examine and interfere with this. Fifth, we 
should conscientiously conduct general price inspection and 
resolutely and strictly handle in line with law the acts of 
raising prices without authorization, arbitrarily raising the 
standards of charges, violating the regulation of clearly 
marking the prices, arbitrarily raising prices on the excuse of 
tax increase, and seeking exorbitant profits by raising prices. 
Meanwhile, it is necessary to strictly enforce laws in the 
market, and deal strict blows to law-breaking elements and 
unlawful acts on manipulating the markets and mixing real 
products with false ones. Sixth, we should give further play to 
the role of the price analyzing and monitoring system and 
closely monitor the trend of market changes so that policy 
decisions can be taken in a timely manner. We should step up 
efforts to study and formulate laws and regulations to combat 
the practice of seeking exorbitant profits and further 
institutionalize the price management work. We should recognize 
that the rational price hikes are advantageous to the 
convergence of commodities in Beijing which is one of centers 
for establishing contacts domestically and internationally. We 
should deeply understand the people's concerns and worries 
towards commodity prices, and while adjusting the prices, strive 
to push the economy forward in an effort to unceasingly increase 
the incomes of the urban and rural people and make their 
increase in incomes higher than the increase in prices. Our 
task is to enable the people of various nationalities across the 
municipality to attain the well-off level of moderate prosperity 
ahead of schedule and to reach common prosperity through 
long-term and unremitting efforts. 
  At present, there are two kinds of people whose income 
enhancement is slow and the living is fairly difficult. The 
first kind of people are the low-income workers in cities and 
towns, which are mainly concentrated on difficult plants, shops, 
and schools, and the retired workers and residents who have no 
working ability. Regarding this kind of people, we should raise 
their living standards through various channels, such as 
deepening reform, developing production, carrying out 
diversified undertakings, raising economic efficiency, 
supporting them in terms of policies and giving them necessary 
subsidies. The second kind of people are the difficult 
households living in outlying remote mountainous areas. They 
are living in scattered places with poor production conditions 
and low ability to combat disasters. Regarding this kind of 
people, we may guide them to march towards prosperity by 
developing the mountain resources. Some of them may become 
prosperous by moving to the plains to participate in production 
labor. Support and relief should be given to a small number of 
people who cannot find a way out for the time being. 
  The affairs of cooking wood, rice, cooking oil, salt, 
clothes, foodstuffs, housing conditions, and transport means, 
are the big events related to the basic life and immediate 
interest of the people. Governments and leading cadres at all 
levels should must attach great importance on these events, show 
concern at all times for the weal and woe of the masses, and 
adopt every possible way and means to help the mass overcome 
their difficulties. As for the problems that cannot be dealt 
with at present, they should also present an explanation in a 
timely manner to obtain the understanding of the mass and 
actively create conditions for gradually dealing with them. 
Improving the people's lives represents a long-term and gradual 
process. We should uphold the socialist principles and policies 
on distributions to correctly deal with the relationship between 
immediate and long-term interest and between partial and whole 
interest. By proceeding from the conditions of the municipality 
and the country, we should carry forward the spirit of 
pioneering careers arduously, working industriously, and 
practicing economy; and vigorously guard against extravagance 
and waste. Showing concern for the people's lives represents a 
duty-bound task undertaken by governments at all levels. 
Therefore, we must make all-out efforts to resolutely and 
successfully implement the task. 
  E. We should continuously deepen the reform and accelerate 
the establishment of socialist market economic systems. 
  The Third Plenary Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee 
formulated the overall plan for establishing the systems of 
socialist market economy and a series of important measures for 
reform have been successively issued. We must resolutely 
implement them, ensure the smooth enforcement of them, and 
strive to achieve substantial progress in the following aspects: 
  First, we should further deepen the enterprise reform and 
accelerate the establishment of modern enterprise systems. By 
closely following the target of shifting the management 
mechanism of enterprises, we should actively explore the 
effective way of establishing modern enterprise systems. Except 
for the enterprises assigned by the state for taking up the 
pilot work in this regard, various industries and trades across 
the municipality should select a large number of large and 
medium-sized enterprises to take up the pilot work. By bearing 
the reality in minds we should earnestly popularize the 
experience gained by the First Light Industrial General 
Corporation in the comprehensive associated reform so as to 
promote the increase of assets' value, the transfer of 
industries, the shifting of mechanism and function, and the 
transfer of staff members and workers. Efforts should be made 
to broaden the pilot work of reform in the shareholding system 
and to actively and adequately conduct the work of having stocks 
enter markets. An emphasis should be placed on developing a 
large number of transregional and transtrade large enterprise 
groups, chain enterprises, and comprehensive shopping centers 
that are with the public ownership as the mainstay and the 
property right combination as the link. The state-owned small 
enterprises should continue to conduct multiple reforms in 
having the state-owned enterprises run by civilians, enforcing 
contract and rent systems in enterprise management, establishing 
shareholding system, and conducting auction of property rights. 
Based on knowing well the property rights, the collectively 
owned enterprises in urban areas should conduct reform by 
adequately selecting the organizational style of enterprises. 
Efforts should be continuously made to push forward the 
optimization and reorganization of labor forces, which have been 
proved as effective; and to deepen the reform among the 
enterprise internal systems of labor affairs, personnel affairs, 
and distribution. Meanwhile, we should reinforce the managerial 
organs of state assets at municipal and district-county levels; 
explore rational form and ways for the management and business 
of state assets; and ensure the state assets to increase their 
value and the right and interest of state assets not to be 
infringed. While promoting the development of the state and 
collective economies, we should encourage the development of 
enterprises run by individuals, private units, and foreign 
firms; and enhance the management over them in line with the law. 
  Second, we should regard as an emphasis the fostering of 
markets for major factors of production and accelerate the 
establishment of market systems. While continuously improving 
the markets of consumer goods in various categories, an emphasis 
should be placed on developing a large number of large wholesale 
markets with multiple functions and comprehensive character. 
Efforts should be continuously made to develop or improve 
financial markets that are chiefly in charge of raising funds 
and to enliven the channels of fund raising. We should 
establish markets for the transaction of property rights to 
promote the circulation and value increase of capital. Efforts 
should be made to further perfect the markets of real estate and 
to strictly conduct management over them to ensure the profits 
of state land. We should broaden or improve the labor force 
markets and perfect the service systems for job seekers. We 
should also arrange to establish central markets with multiple 
functions for technical talks and standardized information 
markets. Efforts should be made to actively and adequately 
conduct the pilot work for establishing the markets of futures 
and to vigorously develop intermediate organizations for various 
markets. We should perfect the market regulations and rules, 
maintain the market order, strictly standardize and supervise 
marketing acts, oppose to abnormal competitions, resolutely 
punish in line with the law the production and sale of fake and 
substandard-quality products, and protect the legal rights and 
interest of producers and consumers. 
  Third, we should actively promote the reform of the 
departments in charge of overall economic management and 
establish and improve more rapidly the system for overall 
economic regulation and control. In-depth reform of the tax 
system should be conducted in a down-to-earth manner. On the 
premise that the vested interests of districts and counties are 
not affected, the municipality will apply the revenue-sharing 
system to districts and counties, levy taxes according to the 
new tax system, making accounts according to the old system, and 
do a good job in the coordination between the new system for the 
distribution of state-owned enterprises' profits and the 
original contract system. Enterprises which ask to continue the 
agreements on their respective methods for reform may continue 
to implement the agreements until 1995 after obtaining approval 
by the municipal government. Regarding the government-approved 
tax reduction or exemption projects or enterprises enjoying tax 
reduction or exemption whose reduction or exemption term has not 
expired, they should be reexamined and affirmed by relevant 
state departments according to regulations, and the method of 
"levying taxes first and then refunding the taxes" should be 
applied to them. We should actively support the separation 
between the policy lending and commercial lending of banks and 
steadily promote the transformation of specialized banks into 
commercial banks. We should greatly develop local banking 
insurance business and establish the Beijing Development Bank, 
the Merchants Bank, urban cooperative banks, rural cooperative 
banks, and, after State Council approval, two or three joint 
venture banks and foreign-funded banks. We should establish the 
Beijing securities exchange center as soon as possible and 
strive for opening of a few local securities companies. We 
should clarify the major investors and corresponding scope of 
investment, standardize the investment activities, and explore 
the new investment and lending methods. We should strengthen 
the overall regulation and control over the economy. The 
focuses are as follows. 1) The regulation and control over 
funds. We should resolutely implement the State Council 
regulations on strictly controlling the scope of fixed asset 
investment, strive to make the investment pattern more rational, 
and concentrate financial resources on key construction 
projects. 2) The regulation and control over the market. We 
should improve as soon as possible the reserve and regulatory 
systems for the important commodities that have a bearing on the 
national economy and people's livelihood and the special risk 
fund, enhance the government's capacity and means to regulate 
and control market prices, and ensure the thrivingness and 
relative stability of the market. Meanwhile, we should 
strengthen the statistic, monitoring, forecast, and warning 
systems for the economic operation of the entire municipality 
and gain the initiative in the regulation and control. 
  Fourth, we should accelerate the reform of government 
organizations and realistically change the functions of the 
government. We should follow the principle of separating 
government functions from business management and the principle 
of simplifying structures and promoting unity and efficiency to 
do a good job in defining the government functions, number, and 
size, step up the work to dismiss temporary personnel and those 
on loan and disband temporary and overlapping organizations, and 
complete the reform of the municipal-level government 
organizations within this year. Meanwhile, we should do a good 
job in the reform of county-level organizations. Through the 
reform, governments at all levels should promote the 
transformation of their own functions, improve their work 
styles, and raise their work efficiency. In the management of 
economic work, in particular, we should devolve to enterprises 
the work within the scope of their autonomy and to the market 
the issues that should be handled by the market and give full 
play to the role of trade associations, chambers of commerce, 
and other intermediary organizations of the market so that the 
government can truly shift its work focus to macroeconomic 
regulation and control, overall coordination, and social 
administration. We should intensify the training of government 
personnel at all levels and continue the good job in the 
transition to the state public service system. 
  Fifth, we should greatly promote the social security system. 
We should improve the methods for the calculation and 
distribution of basic pension, establish the mechanism for the 
normal increase of retirement pay, and gradually implement the 
socialized management of retire staff members and workers. We 
should earnestly summarize and disseminate in a timely manner 
the experiences of Xicheng District, continue to improve the 
free medical care and the reform of the labor insurance and 
medical administrative system, and promote the experiment with 
the overall planning for the medical fees for the serious 
diseases of enterprise staff and workers and with the special 
account of the medical funds of individual staff and workers. 
We should improve the unemployment insurance system, institute 
the system more extensively, fix a minimum wage requirement, 
ensure the basic life of the personnel who lose their jobs, and 
conduct various forms of employment training to provide 
favorable conditions for their reemployment. We should 
strengthen the collection and management of social insurance 
funds and explore the ways to maintain and increase their value. 
We should continue the reform and development of social 
welfare, social relief, special care to disabled servicemen and 
family members of revolutionary martyrs and servicemen, rural 
old-age insurance, and other social security undertakings. 
  F. We should positively use foreign capital and further 
expand the scale of opening to the outside world. 
  Using foreign capital should continuously be regarded as the 
most important issue of opening to the outside world. New 
breakthroughs should be made in the foreign investment scales, 
spheres, and forms. Foreign businessmen should be guided to 
concentrate their investment on transforming old plants, 
developing the tertiary industry, building urban infrastructural 
facilities, and developing the well-being project. We should 
positively adopt various forms conforming to the international 
practice to attract multinational companies to build and 
cooperatively manage large-sized key projects. We should 
ceaselessly improve the investment environment, accelerate the 
planning and establishment of the modernized port system of the 
capital, and firmly attend to opening the railway and highway 
ports with conditions to the outside world. The investment 
examination and approval procedures should be simplified, a 
treasury of projects which are prepared for foreign investors' 
selections should be established, the local economic regulations 
on the economy involving foreign nationals should be perfected 
in a timely manner, and the management of three types of 
foreign-funded enterprises should be strengthened according to 
laws so as to increase the amounts of capital introduced, the 
business opening rate, and the economic results. We should 
positively strive for and also well use foreign loans and 
continue to do a good job in introducing technologies, skilled 
persons, and managerial work. 
  It is necessary to steadily promote the construction of 
various categories of development zones and small industrial 
zones. The Beijing economic and technological development zone 
should emulate the successful experiences gained by brotherly 
provinces and municipalities; set up a completely new 
high-efficient operational and managerial mechanism that 
conforms to the international practice; concentrate human, 
material, and financial resources to achieve the short-term 
construction and the long-term planning; and form appropriate 
scales as soon as possible. The new-tech industrial development 
experimental zone should continue to deepen the reform of the 
managerial system, bring into play the advantages of scientific 
and technological industries, pioneer channels for movement of 
capital, improve the investment structure, and accelerate the 
pace of industrialization and internationalization. The small 
industrial zones of districts and counties should positively 
assimilate foreign capital and domestic capital and step up 
development and construction on a large scale. 
  We should firmly attend to the reform of the foreign trade 
system and continue to expand foreign economic relations and 
trade. A foreign trade operational mechanism and a foreign 
trade managerial mechanism that suit the general rules for 
international economy should be set up as soon as possible. We 
should set up the Beijing import and export credit and 
investment company, organize and set up an organization for 
management of state-owned assets of economic and trade 
departments, and set up a foreign trade development fund so as 
to expand foreign economic relations and trade. We should 
continue to delegate the right to management of imports and 
exports to the enterprises with conditions, widely open domestic 
goods resources channels, widen the international market, 
increase the proportion of advantageous commodities and 
machinery and electronics commodities in the total export 
commodities, and ensure that the annual export value should 
reach $1.83 billion. We should vigorously develop the tourist 
trade, the foreign service trade, and the export of technologies 
and laborers, and form a new pattern of gaining foreign exchange 
from all-round development of both trade and nontrade. We 
should continue to run overseas enterprises; develop a group of 
internationalized, industrialized, and institutionalized trading 
companies. Coastal and border areas as well as the areas along 
the rivers are encouraged to develop nongovernmental trade 
activities. 
  We should positively expand friendly contacts with foreign 
countries and establish, step by step, friendly contacts with 
the capitals and large cities of increasingly more foreign 
countries. The Sixth Far East and South Pacific Sports Meet for 
the Handicapped will be held in Beijing this September. The 
Fourth World Women's Congress will be held in Beijing in 
September 1995. These are two international grand meetings that 
can produce great impact. Time is pressing, and the tasks are 
heavy. From now on, we must pay high attention to them, 
carefully make preparations, and ensure the successful 
convocation of these meetings. 
  G. We should persistently carry forward democracy, 
administer 
the municipality strictly according to laws, and further 
strengthen the construction of the socialist democracy and the 
legal system. 
  The construction of the socialist democratic politics is one 
of the basic contents of the socialist modernization. We must 
wholeheartedly rely on the working class and the broad masses of 
the people, fully carry forward democracy, and perfect a system 
of making policy decisions more democratic and scientific. The 
capital's major policy decisions on modernization and reform 
should be made by extensively listening to the masses' opinions 
and consciously accepting the supervisions by the people's 
congresses, their standing committees, the people's deputies, 
and the broad masses of the people. 
  We should further 
widen the channels for having CPPCC members, democratic party 
members, and nonparty personages to participate in and discuss 
political affairs; and report important situations in a timely 
manner. We should pay full attention to trade union 
organizations, Communist Youth League organizations, women's 
federations, some other mass organizations, and especially 
invited persons' role as a bridge and a link; bring into play 
the supervisory functions of the mass media; and clear and widen 
the channels for linking the governments with the masses. We 
should continue to perfect the system of soliciting the people's 
opinions and persist in the system of holding seasonal forums 
attended by science professionals, technicians, and specialists. 
We should do a good job in receiving visitors, handling 
incoming letters from the masses, and answering phone calls to 
the mayor; strengthen the construction of grass-roots political 
power; and perfect the enterprise democratic management system 
and the urbanite and villager autonomous system. We should 
bring into full play the positions and roles of the neighborhood 
committees and villagers committees in building the grass-roots 
democracy and realistically safeguard the people's democratic 
rights to managing national, economic, and social affairs 
according to laws. We should comprehensively implement the 
party's policies toward nationalities, deeply launch the 
campaign of unity among various nationalities and national 
progress, and promote economic and cultural development of the 
streets and villages inhabited by the minority nationalities. We 
should further implement the policies on religions and unite 
with and guide the personages of the religious circles to 
contribute to the construction of the capital. We should fully 
understand the importance of Overseas Chinese affairs and the 
work toward Taiwan and bring into full play the peculiar 
advantages of these departments as well as the broad masses of 
Overseas Chinese and Hong Kong, Macao, and Taiwan compatriots' 
irreplaceable functions for doing the work in the political, 
economic, and cultural spheres and for establishing contacts 
with foreign countries. 
  There must be perfect systems to standardize and safeguard 
the setup and perfection of the socialist market economic 
system. We should sum up and popularize the good examples and 
experiences in administering municipal affairs according to laws 
and upgrading the level of administering municipal affairs 
according to laws. It is necessary to accelerate the pace of 
administrative legislation. This year, 18 draft rules and 
regulations are planned to be submitted to the municipal 
people's congress for examinations. The rules and regulations 
that are not suitable to the requirements for the socialist 
market economy should comprehensively be sorted out. The 
enforcement of administrative laws and the supervision over the 
enforcement of laws should be strengthened and improved. The 
governments at various levels should do administrative affairs 
and handle affairs according to laws and resolutely correct the 
phenomena of not observing laws, not strictly enforcing laws, 
and not investigating law-breakers. We should set up and 
develop law service organizations and cultivate a large number 
of qualified persons with knowledge of laws. We should 
strengthen the management of law enforcers and upgrade their 
quality. We should continue to expand the trial implementation 
of the system that people's policemen go the rounds to inspect 
the enforcement of laws. We should adopt various forms to 
strengthen the propaganda and education on the legal system, 
popularize the general knowledge of laws, and enhance the 
citizens' awareness of laws. 
  H. We should persist in the policy on taking a two-hand 
approach and being sure that both hands are tough and vigorously 
strengthen the construction of the socialist spiritual 
civilization. 
  To build the first-class socialist modernized international 
city, we must have not only a high degree of material 
civilization but also a high degree of spiritual civilization. 
The focal point of the spiritual civilization is to arm the 
leaders at various levels and the people of various 
nationalities in the municipality with Comrade Deng Xiaoping's 
theory on building socialism with Chinese characteristics and to 
mobilize the broad masses of the people's enthusiasm for 
fighting for the realization of the grand goal of socialist 
modernization. In line with the 45th anniversary of the 
founding of the PRC, we should deeply conduct the education on 
patriotism, collectivism, and socialism and educate new persons 
with ideals, education, morality, and a sense of discipline. We 
should hold high the main melody of socialism and persist in an 
accurate mass media orientation. In the course of setting up 
the socialist market economic system, we should lay particular 
stress on ideals, discipline, unity, and the overall situation. 
We should positively guide the broad masses of the people in 
the municipality, particularly the youngsters, to foster an 
accurate outlook on life and value and to oppose money worship, 
out-and-out egoism, and corrosive ways of life. We should 
further enhance the "awareness of the capital;" and unswervingly 
launch the activities of "learning from Lei Feng and fostering 
new practices," "of creating civilized cities, building 
civilized units, and being civilized citizens," and of assessing 
and selecting good citizens emerging from being ready to take up 
the cudgels for a just cause." The leading organs and leading 
cadres at various levels should positively organize forces and 
be the first to participate in social welfare activities. It is 
necessary to vigorously commend heroes, model figures, and the 
lofty ideas and heroic activities of learning from Xu Honggang. 
We should strengthen the education on social morality and 
professional ethics and strive to form good social practices of 
being patriotic, respecting jobs, diligently engaging in study, 
being united and friendly, being happy by helping the people, 
supporting the people in danger and with difficulties, being 
ready to take up the cudgels for a just cause, respecting the 
old, and cherishing the young. 
  We should conduct 
double-support work in a down-to-earth manner, promote unity 
between the Army and the government and between the Army and the 
people, and continue to strengthen national defense education 
and militia reserve-duty work. In the activities on building 
civilized residential areas, we should give priorities to 
improving the living environment, perfect the social service, 
and maintain a stable and good social order and a clean and 
beautiful living environment. 
  I. We should resolutely safeguard a political and social 
stability in the capital. 
  Stability is the guarantee for smoothly carrying out reform 
and the modernization drive. Without stability, we will have no 
way of doing anything, and economic development as well as 
improvement in the people's living will vanish like soap 
bubbles. Stability in the capital is particularly important 
because it directly affects the whole country. We must 
safeguard stability in the capital as we cherish our own eyes, 
and must grasp stability as a task of prime importance during 
this year. 
  This year the reform strength is big and the development 
tasks are heavy. Under the situation in which the relations of 
interests and the patterns are being changed, all sorts of new 
contradictions will emerge. We must pay full attention to this. 
Before the issuance of all major reform and development 
measures, we must make good preparations, estimate the problems 
that may possibly occur, give play to the advantages of 
ideological and political work, properly handle contradictions, 
and prevent them from becoming more acute. 
  We should also recognize that the hostile forces and 
elements 
inside and outside the territory are still awaiting chances to 
launch subversive and sabotage activities. We must never lower 
our guard on this. We must carefully guard against this, 
resolutely punish them strictly in line with law when 
discovered, never be soft-handed, eliminate all hidden perils 
during the budding stage, and never allow them to wantonly 
create troubles. 
  The public security problem is also a problem which the 
masses of people are universally concerned about. We should 
mobilize forces from all sectors and actively strengthen the 
comprehensive management of public security. It is necessary to 
uphold the principle of "regarding lookout on public security as 
the mainstay, dealing blows to specific cases as the priorities, 
and give simultaneous attention to attack and prevention and to 
both radical and stopgap measures," strictly implement the 
system of responsibility for comprehensive public security 
management, deal strict blows to all sorts of serious criminal 
crimes and economic criminal activities, resolutely eliminate 
all sorts of social repulsive phenomena, and strictly punish 
criminal elements in line with law. At present, special efforts 
should be made to intensify management over the inflow of 
transients and at the juncture of cities and towns, and further 
enhance the people's sense of safety. It is necessary to 
strengthen the building of public security, judicial and other 
administrative law enforcing contingents, replenish their 
strength, improve equipment, strengthen political and 
professional training, and unceasingly enhance the law enforcing 
capacity and level. 
  J. We should deeply conduct the anticorruption struggle and 
realistically strengthen administrative honesty and diligence. 
  The anticorruption struggle is a major matter affecting the 
success or failure of reform and development and determining the 
rise and fall of the party and the country. Although we 
achieved the expected results last year, it is impossible to 
radically eliminate the soil and conditions for breeding and 
spreading corrupt phenomena within a short period of time. We 
must fully understand the urgency, arduousness, complexity, and 
protractedness of the anticorruption struggle, uphold the 
principle of "first, be resolute, second, be enduring, and 
third, achieve expected results," and deeply and continuously 
conduct anticorruption in line with the central plans. 
  This year the priority of anticorruption is to make 
continued 
efforts to conscientiously implement the three tasks proposed by 
the central authorities. First, leading cadres at and above the 
section level must act strictly in accordance with five 
stipulations proposed by the central authorities last year and 
the new five stipulations put forward this year, conscientiously 
conduct self examination and self correction, give priorities to 
solving problems emerged in merging enterprises, buying and 
selling stock, buying and borrowing cars in violation of 
stipulations, and using public funds to furnish one's own houses 
above the set standards, and strictly implement these 
stipulations in our future work and living. Second, we should 
concentrate efforts on investigating and handling major and 
appalling cases with emphasis on investigating and handling 
cases involving leading cadres who engage in corruption and 
bribery and abuse their powers to seek personal gain, cases 
involving law and discipline enforcing personnel who act wrongly 
out of personal consideration, engage in malpractices, take 
bribes, and bend the law, and cases on law and discipline 
violations involving the legal entities. 
  Once a case is 
discovered, it should be investigated and dealt with immediately 
without any tolerance. All departments and units should be 
forbidden to interfere with the investigation and punishment to 
major and appalling cases. Those who intercede for somebody 
else should be seriously criticized and educated, and those who 
shield criminals should be resolutely punished. All levels of 
governments should guarantee the investigation of and the 
punishment to criminal cases in manpower, material resources, 
and expenses. Third, correction of unhealthy trends of trades 
should be strengthened. The charges already announced to be 
abolished should be abolished resolutely, and on no account 
should these charges be restored secretly. The system of 
"imposing supervision card over exaction of charges" should be 
tried out, and the regulation of separating the exaction of 
administrative fees from the revenues of fines should be carried 
out. Pertinent departments of the municipality should strictly 
examine and approve functionaries' official trips to foreign 
counties and regions, and the trips that are proven unnecessary 
should all be banned. The unhealthy trends bitterly complained 
by the masses, such as abusing one's power to seek personal 
gain, extorting money from masses, pocketing a portion of 
masses' benefits, and utilizing one's power, post, and monopoly 
position to force the masses to buy or sell something and to 
collect fees from the masses, that are committed by a small 
number of persons of law enforcement departments, supervisory 
departments, managerial departments, and public service 
departments, should be regarded as the major targets of the 
anticorruption campaign and efforts should be made to achieve 
practical results. 
  The anticorruption campaign should be subject to the policy 
of opposing and correcting simultaneously, opposing and building 
simultaneously, and paying equal attention to root cause and 
signs. In-depth research should be made for the source and soil 
that may give rise to corruption. Efforts should be made to 
perfect systems and regulations and to strengthen supervision in 
order to gradually establish the mechanism that can prevent 
corrupt phenomena from emerging and spreading. At the same 
time, we should depend on the masses to check corruption and 
combine the masses' reports with the investigation and handling 
of special organs. Those who report on corruption cases should 
be protected, and those who make contributions to reporting on 
corruption cases should be commended and awarded. The role of 
democratic parties and non-party figures should be brought into 
full play. These parties and figures should be organized to 
participate in the anticorruption campaign, and their opinions 
and suggestions should be heard conscientiously. Law and 
discipline enforcement departments, such as judicial, auditing, 
and supervisory departments, should report anticorruption 
situation to the masses in a time manner and should voluntarily 
subject themselves to the supervision by the masses. Typical 
cases should be made public to educate cadres and the masses. 
  Administrative honesty should be closely combined with 
administrative diligence. Wholeheartedly serving the people is 
the fundamental purpose of the government work, and honestly 
performing official duties and diligently serving the people are 
the most fundamental demands on all state functionaries as well 
as the code of conduct that all state functionaries must 
observe. While developing the socialist market economy, we 
should on no account introduce the principle of commodity 
exchange to the political affairs activities of state organs and 
should not strike a deal between power and money. At the same 
time, we should not tolerate such behaviors as being indifferent 
to the masses, being irresponsible for work, being dilatory in 
doing things, and shifting responsibility onto others. All the 
dereliction of duties by state functionaries should be 
investigated and held into account. To improve work style and 
work efficiency, working personnel of governments at all levels, 
leading cadres in particular, should strive to study more, 
engage in fewer social intercourse, look into real situation, 
engage in tangible deeds, tell the truth, guard against boasting 
and exaggeration, stress on quality and efficiency, take the 
overall situation into account, observe discipline, and 
conscientiously fulfill duties. The vast numbers of the masses 
bitterly hate corrupt phenomena. They are concerned with and 
take an active part in the anticorruption campaign, thus 
manifesting their great trust and ardent expectation on the 
people's government. We should never let the vast numbers of the 
masses down by profoundly and persistently carrying the 
anticorruption campaign through to the end without any deviation. 
  Fellow deputies: Tasks for 1994 are very heavy. To 
fulfill the target of this year, we must further emancipate our 
minds; break the fetter of ossified and out-dated concepts by 
closely following the center of economic construction; 
resolutely overcome the blindness, complacency, and passiveness; 
boldly engage in exploration; and bravely create something new. 
Current conditions both at home and abroad are very favorable, 
therefore, we must firmly size the precious historical 
opportunity by displaying the spirit of racing against time and 
concentrate our efforts on wholeheartedly and successfully 
conducting economic construction so as to strive to achieve 
faster and better development. 
  Investigation and study represent the basic work undertaken 
by governments, the basic quality possessed by leading cadres, 
and the bridge that links the theory with the reality. Only by 
deeply carrying out investigation and study can we deeply 
understand the conditions of the municipality and the country; 
grasp the general and special laws of developing various 
undertakings; foster the scientific spirit of seeking truth; 
truly grasp the right of voicing opinions, exercising 
leadership, and making policy decisions in the government work; 
seize the major contradiction and crucial link that exert 
decisive influence on the whole situation; and concentrate our 
efforts on making breakthrough in key projects to push forward 
the overall development of work in various fields. The people 
will not be satisfied with the vague generalization and the 
unchanged style of things. We should regard the hot problems 
for which the masses have shown great concerns and the difficult 
problems cropping up in the work as an emphasis of investigation 
and study and formulate plans for implementing the investigation 
and study work. All leading cadres should define units at 
grass-roots levels for their investigation and study operation; 
learn about their situation frequently; actively help these 
units deal with their problems; and bravely stand on the 
forefront of reform, opening up, and economic construction to 
exercise the leadership over the great change. 
  The deepening of reform and opening up and the development 
of 
modernizations urgently require the working personnel, 
particularly leading cadres, of governments at all levels to 
work hard; to successfully conduct study in a down-to-earth 
manner; and to consciously apply the scientific theory to 
directing the practice. Focal points for the work this year are 
as follows: 1) A good job should be done in studying the third 
volume of "Deng Xiaoping's Selected Works" and in arming 
themselves with the socialist theory of building socialism with 
Chinese characteristics to unify our thinking and action. 2) We 
should earnestly study the decision made at the Third Plenary 
Session of the 14th CPC Central Committee, the important reform 
measures issued by the central authorities, and the basic 
theories and knowledge of socialist market economy. 3) We 
should study the legal knowledge and enhance the sense of laws 
and the capability of handling problems in line with the law. 4) 
We should vigorously grasp the necessary knowledge in science, 
culture, and specialized fields for modernizations. Meanwhile, 
we should uphold the party's mass line; learn from the mass 
modestly; increase our capability in practice; and upgrade our 
quality in an overall way in the fields of theory and culture as 
well as our level in scientific management. The more such 
cadres we have possessed and the more prospects the capital's 
undertakings of modernizations will have. 
  Fellow deputies: The bright future of the capital in reform, 
opening up, and socialist modernizations has unfolded before our 
eyes and urges us to score new achievements. The opportunity in 
this regard is precious, tasks for this regard are heavy, and 
the road of carrying out these tasks is long. Let us follow the 
direction guided by the socialist theory of Comrade Deng 
Xiaoping with regard to building socialism with Chinese 
characteristics and closely rally round the CPC Central 
Committee with Comrade Jiang Zemin as the core to open new 
ideas and to create a new situation under the leadership of the 
Beijing Municipal CPC Committee as well as to continuously win a 
new victory in the capital's program of socialist modernizations. 

